Illinois, session 104th, HB1191.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Sections 16-169.1, 16-199, 17-143.5, and 17-149.1 and 6by adding Sections 16-169.2 and 17-143.6 as follows: 7    (40 ILCS 5/16-169.1)8    Sec. 16-169.1. Testimony and the production of records. 9The secretary of the Board shall have the power to issue 10subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and the 11production of documents and records, including law enforcement 12records maintained by law enforcement agencies, in conjunction 13with the determination of employer payments required under 14subsection (f) of Section 16-158, a disability claim, an 15administrative review proceeding, an attempt to obtain 16information to assist in the collection of sums due to the 17System, or a felony forfeiture investigation under Section 1816-169.2 or 16-199. The fees of witnesses for attendance and 19travel shall be the same as the fees of witnesses before the 20circuit courts of this State and shall be paid by the party 21seeking the subpoena. The Board may apply to any circuit court 22in the State for an order requiring compliance with a subpoena 23issued under this Section. Subpoenas issued under this Section   HB1191- 2 -LRB104 03842 RPS 13866 b1shall be subject to applicable provisions of the Code of Civil 2Procedure.3(Source: P.A. 99-450, eff. 8-24-15.) 4    (40 ILCS 5/16-169.2 new)5    Sec. 16-169.2. Sexual abuse accusations. An employer must 6notify the Board if a retiring member has been accused of 7sexually abusing a student. The Board may, through an 8administrative hearing, review the claim of sexual abuse and 9may order that the member's benefits be forfeited under 10Section 16-199. 11    (40 ILCS 5/16-199)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 16-199)12    Sec. 16-199. Felony conviction; sexual abuse of a student. 13None of the benefits provided for in this Article shall be paid 14to any person who is convicted of any felony relating to or 15arising out of or in connection with his or her service as a 16teacher.17    None of the benefits provided for in this Article shall be 18paid to any person who otherwise would receive a survivor 19benefit who is convicted of any felony relating to or arising 20out of or in connection with the service of the teacher from 21whom the benefit results.22    None of the benefits provided for in this Article shall be 23paid to any person who first becomes a member on or after the 24effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General   HB1191- 3 -LRB104 03842 RPS 13866 b1Assembly and who the Board determines under Section 16-169.2 2to have sexually abused a student. 3    This Section shall not operate to impair any contract or 4vested right acquired prior to July 9, 1955 under any law or 5laws continued in this Article, nor to preclude the right to a 6refund, and for the changes under Public Act 100-334 this 7amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly, shall not impair 8any contract or vested right acquired by a survivor prior to 9August 25, 2017 (the effective date of Public Act 100-334) 10this amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly. The changes 11made by this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly 12shall not operate to impair any contract or vested right 13acquired before the effective date of this amendatory Act of 14the 104th General Assembly. The System may sue any such person 15to collect all moneys paid in excess of refundable 16contributions.17    All teachers entering or re-entering service after July 9, 181955 shall be deemed to have consented to the provisions of 19this Section as a condition of membership, and all 20participants entering service subsequent to August 25, 2017 21(the effective date of Public Act 100-334) this amendatory Act 22of the 100th General Assembly shall be deemed to have 23consented to the provisions of Public Act 100-334 this 24amendatory Act as a condition of participation. All teachers 25entering service on or after the effective date of this 26amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly shall be deemed   HB1191- 4 -LRB104 03842 RPS 13866 b1to have consented to the provisions of this amendatory Act of 2the 104th General Assembly as a condition of membership.3(Source: P.A. 100-334, eff. 8-25-17.) 4    (40 ILCS 5/17-143.5)5    Sec. 17-143.5. Testimony and the production of records. 6The Board shall have the power to issue subpoenas to compel the 7attendance of witnesses and the production of documents and 8records in conjunction with the determination of employer 9payments required under subsection (c) of Section 17-116, a 10disability claim, an administrative review proceeding, an 11attempt to obtain information to assist in the collection of 12sums due to the Fund, or a felony forfeiture investigation 13under Section 17-143.6 or 17-149.1. The fees of witnesses for 14attendance and travel shall be the same as the fees of 15witnesses before the circuit courts of this State and shall be 16paid by the party seeking the subpoena. The Board may apply to 17any circuit court in the State for an order requiring 18compliance with a subpoena issued under this Section. 19Subpoenas issued under this Section shall be subject to 20applicable provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure.21(Source: P.A. 99-786, eff. 8-12-16.) 22    (40 ILCS 5/17-143.6 new)23    Sec. 17-143.6. Sexual abuse accusations. An Employer must 24notify the Board if a retiring member has been accused of   HB1191- 5 -LRB104 03842 RPS 13866 b1sexually abusing a student. The Board may, through an 2administrative hearing, review the claim of sexual abuse and 3may order that the member's benefits be forfeited under 4Section 17-149.1. 5    (40 ILCS 5/17-149.1)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 17-149.1)6    Sec. 17-149.1. Felony conviction; sexual abuse of a 7student. None of the benefits provided for in this Article 8shall be paid to any person who is convicted of any felony 9relating to or arising out of or in connection with his or her 10service as a teacher.11    None of the benefits provided for in this Article shall be 12paid to any person who otherwise would receive a survivor 13benefit who is convicted of any felony relating to or arising 14out of or in connection with the service of the teacher from 15whom the benefit results.16    None of the benefits provided for in this Article shall be 17paid to any person who first becomes a member on or after the 18effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 19Assembly and who the Board determines under Section 17-143.6 20to have sexually abused a student. 21    This Section shall not operate to impair any contract or 22vested right acquired prior to January 1, 1988, nor to 23preclude the right to a refund, and for the changes under 24Public Act 100-334 this amendatory Act of the 100th General 25Assembly, shall not impair any contract or vested right   HB1191- 6 -LRB104 03842 RPS 13866 b1acquired by a survivor prior to August 25, 2017 (the effective 2date of Public Act 100-334) this amendatory Act of the 100th 3General Assembly. The changes made by this amendatory Act of 4the 104th General Assembly shall not operate to impair any 5contract or vested right acquired before the effective date of 6this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 7    All teachers entering service after January 1, 1988 shall 8be deemed to have consented to the provisions of this Section 9as a condition of membership, and all participants entering 10service subsequent to August 25, 2017 (the effective date of 11Public Act 100-334) this amendatory Act of the 100th General 12Assembly shall be deemed to have consented to the provisions 13of Public Act 100-334 this amendatory Act as a condition of 14participation. All teachers entering service on or after the 15effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 16Assembly shall be deemed to have consented to the provisions 17of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly as a 18condition of membership.19(Source: P.A. 100-334, eff. 8-25-17.) 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.